test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kol_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - кол: # Noun 122 'eng home/fin koti' - full paradigm
#
     кол+N+Sg+Nom: кол
     кол+N+Sg+Lat: колн
     кол+N+Sg+Abl: колныл
     кол+N+Sg+Ins: колыл
     кол+N+Sg+Tra: колыг

     кол+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: колум
     кол+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: колын
     кол+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: колэ
     кол+N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom: [колме̄н, колмен]
# (2007: 30) short elsewhere not
     кол+N+Sg+PxDu2+Nom: колы̄н
     кол+N+Sg+PxDu3+Nom: колэ̄н
     кол+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: колув
     кол+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: колы̄н
     кол+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: коланыл
     кол+N+Sg+Loc: колт
     кол+N+Sg+PxSg1+Loc: колумт
     кол+N+Sg+PxSg2+Loc: колынт
     кол+N+Sg+PxSg3+Loc: колэт
     кол+N+Sg+PxDu1+Loc: колме̄нт
     кол+N+Sg+PxDu2+Loc: колы̄нт
     кол+N+Sg+PxDu3+Loc: колэ̄нт
     кол+N+Sg+PxPl1+Loc: колувт
     кол+N+Sg+PxPl2+Loc: колы̄нт
     кол+N+Sg+PxPl3+Loc: коланылт
     кол+N+Du+Loc: колыгт
     кол+N+Pl+Loc: колытт
# (Скрибник & Афанасьева 2007: 78) analogue
     кол+N+Du+Nom: колыг
     кол+N+Du+PxSg1+Nom: колагум
     кол+N+Du+PxSg2+Nom: колагын
     кол+N+Du+PxSg3+Nom: колаге
     кол+N+Du+PxDu1+Nom: колагме̄н
     кол+N+Du+PxDu2+Nom: колагы̄н
     кол+N+Du+PxDu3+Nom: колаге̄н
     кол+N+Du+PxPl1+Nom: колагув
     кол+N+Du+PxPl2+Nom: колагы̄н
     кол+N+Du+PxPl3+Nom: колаганыл
     кол+N+Pl+Nom: колыт
     кол+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: коланум
     кол+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: коланын
     кол+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: коланэ
     кол+N+Pl+PxDu1+Nom: коланме̄н
     кол+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom: коланы̄н
     кол+N+Pl+PxDu3+Nom: коланэ̄н
     кол+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom: коланув
     кол+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom: коланы̄н
     кол+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: колананыл
